Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2342
Metropolitan utilities district funds; deposit required.

A metropolitan utilities district shall deposit the funds received or held by the district in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, situated within the boundaries of such district, as shall have been and shall be from time to time approved by the governing body of such district as official depositories for the funds belonging to such district. Such deposit shall be made subject to the conditions in sections 77-2342 to 77-2349. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1933, c. 95, § 1, p. 378;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2530;

R.S.1943, § 77-2342;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 54;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 75;

Laws 2001, LB 177, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 53.